test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-kamrded_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kåʹmrded: # Verb 'to bow / kumartaa' - full paradigm
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kåʹmrdam
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kåʹmrdak
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kååʹmmard
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kåʹmrdep
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kåʹmrdeʹped
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kåʹmrde 
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: kåʹmrdet

     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kåʹmrdem
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kåʹmrdiǩ
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kåʹmrdi
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [kåʹmrdim, kåʹmrdin]
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kåʹmrdid
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kåʹmrde
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: kåʹmrdeš

     kåʹmrded+V+Pot+Sg1: kåʹmrdeʹžem
     kåʹmrded+V+Pot+Sg2: kåʹmrdeʹžiǩ
     kåʹmrded+V+Pot+Sg3: kåʹmrdež
     kåʹmrded+V+Pot+Pl1: [kåʹmrdeʹžep, kåʹmrdeʹžim]
     kåʹmrded+V+Pot+Pl2: kåʹmrdeʹžid 
     kåʹmrded+V+Pot+Pl3: kåʹmrdeʹže
     kåʹmrded+V+Pot+Sg4: kåʹmrdeʹžet
     kåʹmrded+V+Pot+ConNeg: kåʹmrdeʹže

     kåʹmrded+V+Cond+Sg1: kåʹmrdeʹčem
     kåʹmrded+V+Cond+Sg2: kåʹmrdeʹčiǩ
     kåʹmrded+V+Cond+Sg3: kåʹmrdeʹči
     kåʹmrded+V+Cond+Pl1: [kåʹmrdeʹčim, kåʹmrdeʹčep]
     kåʹmrded+V+Cond+Pl2: kåʹmrdeʹčid
     kåʹmrded+V+Cond+Pl3: kåʹmrdeʹče
     kåʹmrded+V+Cond+Sg4: kåʹmrdeʹčeš
     kåʹmrded+V+Cond+ConNeg: kåʹmrdeʹče

     kåʹmrded+V+Imprt+Sg2: kååʹmmerd 
     kåʹmrded+V+Imprt+Sg3: kåʹmrdââǥǥas
     kåʹmrded+V+Imprt+Pl1: kåʹmrdâkap
     kåʹmrded+V+Imprt+Pl2: kåʹmrdeʹǩed
     kåʹmrded+V+Imprt+Pl3: kåʹmrdâkaz
     kåʹmrded+V+Imprt+ConNeg: kåʹmrduku
     kåʹmrded+V+ActEss: kåʹmrdeʹmen
     kåʹmrded+V+Actio: kåʹmrdam
     kåʹmrded+V+PrsPrc: kåʹmrdeei
     kåʹmrded+V+PrfPrc: [kåʹmrdam, kåʹmrdâmma]
     kåʹmrded+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [kåʹmrdummu, kåʹmrduum, kåʹmrdum]
# deduced from Sammallahti/Mosnikoff 1991 -ummu, -uum and -um occur as variants
     kåʹmrded+V+VAbess: [kåʹmrdeǩâni, kåʹmrdeǩeânai]
     kåʹmrded+V+GerTemp: kåʹmrdeen
     kåʹmrded+V+GerInstr: kåʹmrdeeʹl
